Illinois, session 104th, SB1932.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)7    Sec. 2HHHH. Price gouging during a disaster.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Building materials" means lumber, construction tools, 10windows, and anything else used in the building or rebuilding 11of property.12    "Consumer food item or good" means any article that is 13used or intended for use as food, drink, confection, or 14condiment by a person or animal.15    "Emergency supplies" includes, but is not limited to, 16water, flashlights, radios, batteries, candles, blankets, 17soaps, diapers, temporary shelters, tape, toiletries, plywood, 18nails, and hammers.19    "Goods" means tangible chattels bought for use primarily 20for personal, family, or household purposes.21    "Medical supplies" includes, but is not limited to, 22prescription and nonprescription medications, bandages, gauze, 23isopropyl alcohol, masks, and antibacterial products.  SB1932 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10202 SPS 20276 b1    "Repair or reconstruction services" means services 2performed by any person for repairs to residential or 3commercial property, of any type, that is damaged as a result 4of a disaster.5    "Transportation, freight, or storage services" means 6services performed by any company that contracts to move, 7store, or transport personal or business property or that 8rents equipment for those purposes, including towing services. 9    (b) It is an unlawful practice within the meaning of this 10Act, for a period of 45 days after a disaster is declared by 11the President of the United States or the Governor or during 12the continuation period of the disaster if the period is 13extended by the President of the United States or the 14Governor, for any person to sell or offer to sell to a 15consumer, for an unconscionably high price, in the designated 16disaster area any consumer food items or goods; goods or 17services used for emergency cleanup or response; emergency 18supplies; medical supplies; cleaning supplies; building 19materials; housing; lodging; transportation, freight, or 20storage services; repair or reconstruction services; or any 21other necessity.22    (c) For the purposes of this Section, a price is 23unconscionably high if:24        (1) the amount charged represents a gross disparity 25    between the price of the good or service; and26            (A) the price at which the same good or service was   SB1932 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10202 SPS 20276 b1        sold or offered for sale by the person in the usual 2        course of business immediately before the disaster 3        declaration; or4            (B) if the person did not sell or offer for sale 5        the goods or services immediately before the disaster 6        declaration, the price at which similar goods or 7        services were offered for sale or sold by a similarly 8        situated person in the usual course of business 9        immediately before the disaster declaration; and 10        (2) the disparity is not directly attributable to 11    increased prices charged by suppliers, additional costs 12    for labor or materials to provide the good or service, or 13    other increased costs not within the control of the 14    person.15    (d) For purposes of this Section, a price is not 16unconscionably high if: 17        (1) the increase in price is directly attributable to 18    additional costs imposed on the person by the supplier of 19    the goods or directly attributable to additional costs for 20    labor or materials used to provide the services during the 21    declared disaster; or22        (2) if a good or service was offered at a reduced price 23    by the person before the declared disaster, the price is 24    the same as the price the person normally charges for the 25    good or service.26    (e) There is a rebuttable presumption that a price   SB1932 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10202 SPS 20276 b1increase of 20% or more constitutes an unconscionably high 2price if it is not attributable to additional costs imposed on 3the person by the supplier of the goods or directly 4attributable to additional costs for labor or materials used 5to provide the services during the declared disaster. 6    (f) This Section does not apply to the sale of petroleum 7products as defined in 14 Ill. Adm. Code 465.